Utah statutes.
26-18-3.1.   Medicaid expansion.

(1)  The purpose of this section is to expand the coverage of the Medicaid program to persons who are in categories traditionally not served by that program.

(2)  Within appropriations from the Legislature, the department may amend the state plan for medical assistance to provide for eligibility for Medicaid:

(a)  on or after July 1, 1994, for children 12 to 17 years old who live in households below the federal poverty income guideline; and

(b)  on or after July 1, 1995, for persons who have incomes below the federal poverty income guideline and who are aged, blind, or have a disability.

(3) (a)  Within appropriations from the Legislature, on or after July 1, 1996, the Medicaid program may provide for eligibility for persons who have incomes below the federal poverty income guideline.

(b)  In order to meet the provisions of this subsection, the department may seek approval for a demonstration project under 42 U.S.C. Section 1315 from the secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.  This demonstration project may also provide for the voluntary participation of private firms that:

(i)  are newly established or marginally profitable;

(ii)  do not provide health insurance to their employees;

(iii)  employ predominantly low wage workers; and

(iv)  are unable to obtain adequate and affordable health care insurance in the private market.

(4)  Services available for persons described in this section shall include required Medicaid services and may include one or more optional Medicaid services if those services are funded by the Legislature.  The department may also require persons described in this section to meet an asset test.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

